Nebraska, session 109, LB556.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-1816, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-1816 (1)(a) The accused may be arraigned in county court or
district court:
(i) If the accused was eighteen years of age or older when the
alleged offense was committed;
(ii) If the accused was younger than eighteen years of age and was
twelve fourteen years of age or older when an alleged offense punishable
as a Class I, IA, IB, IC, ID, II, or IIA felony was committed; or
(iii) If the alleged offense is a traffic offense as defined in
section 43-245.
(b) Arraignment in county court or district court shall be by
reading to the accused the complaint or information, unless the reading
is waived by the accused when the nature of the charge is made known to
him or her. The accused shall then be asked whether he or she is guilty
or not guilty of the offense charged. If the accused appears in person
and by counsel and goes to trial before a jury regularly impaneled and
sworn, he or she shall be deemed to have waived arraignment and a plea of
not guilty shall be deemed to have been made.
(2) At the time of the arraignment, the county court or district
court shall advise the accused, if the accused was younger than eighteen
years of age at the time the alleged offense was committed, that the
accused may move the county court or district court at any time not later
than thirty days after arraignment, unless otherwise permitted by the
court for good cause shown, to waive jurisdiction in such case to the
juvenile court for further proceedings under the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
This subsection does not apply if the case was transferred to county
court or district court from juvenile court.
(3) For motions to transfer a case from the county court or district
court to juvenile court:
(a) The county court or district court shall schedule a hearing on
-2-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
such motion within fifteen days. The customary rules of evidence shall
not be followed at such hearing. The accused shall be represented by an
attorney. The criteria set forth in section 43-276 shall be considered at
such hearing. After considering all the evidence and reasons presented by
both parties, the case shall be transferred to juvenile court unless a
sound basis exists for retaining the case in county court or district
court; and
(b) The county court or district court shall make a decision on such
motion within thirty days after the hearing and shall set forth findings
for the reason for its decision. If the county court or district court
determines that the accused should be transferred to the juvenile court,
the complete file in the county court or district court shall be
transferred to the juvenile court and the complaint, indictment, or
information may be used in place of a petition therein. The county court
or district court making a transfer shall order the accused to be taken
forthwith to the juvenile court and designate where the juvenile shall be
kept pending determination by the juvenile court. The juvenile court
shall then proceed as provided in the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(4) An order granting or denying transfer of the case from county or
district court to juvenile court shall be considered a final order for
the purposes of appeal. Upon entry of an order, any party may appeal to
the Court of Appeals within ten days. Such review shall be advanced on
the court docket without an extension of time granted to any party except
upon a showing of exceptional cause. Appeals shall be submitted,
assigned, and scheduled for oral argument as soon as the appellee's brief
is due to be filed. The Court of Appeals shall conduct its review in an
expedited manner and shall render the judgment and opinion, if any, as
speedily as possible. During the pendency of an appeal from an order
transferring the case to juvenile court, the juvenile court may enter
temporary orders in the best interests of the juvenile.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(b) of this section, any
-3-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
admission, confession, or statement made by the accused to a
psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist, or licensed mental health
practitioner for purposes of a motion to transfer a case from county
court or district court to juvenile court shall be inadmissible in any
criminal or civil proceeding.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) of this section does not prevent any such
admission, confession, or statement from being:
(i) Admissible in proceedings relating to such motion to transfer;
(ii) Admissible in disposition proceedings of such accused under the
Nebraska Juvenile Code if the case is transferred to juvenile court;
(iii) Included in any presentence investigation report for such
accused if the case is not transferred to juvenile court; and
(iv) Admissible in such case to impeach such accused during cross-
examination if the accused testifies at trial or during juvenile court
proceedings and such testimony is materially inconsistent with a prior
statement made by the accused to a psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist,
or licensed mental health practitioner for purposes of the motion to
transfer such case.
(6) When the accused was younger than eighteen years of age when an
alleged offense was committed, the county attorney or city attorney shall
proceed under section 43-274.
Sec. 2. Section 43-245, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-245 For purposes of the Nebraska Juvenile Code, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Abandonment means a parent's intentionally withholding from a
child, without just cause or excuse, the parent's presence, care, love,
protection, and maintenance and the opportunity for the display of
parental affection for the child;
(2) Age of majority means nineteen years of age;
(3) Alternative to detention means a program or directive that
-4-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
increases supervision of a youth in the community in an effort to ensure
the youth attends court and refrains from committing a new law violation.
Alternative to detention includes, but is not limited to, electronic
monitoring, day and evening reporting centers, house arrest, tracking,
family crisis response, and temporary shelter placement. Except for the
use of manually controlled delayed egress of not more than thirty
seconds, placements that utilize physical construction or hardware to
restrain a youth's freedom of movement and ingress and egress from
placement are not considered alternatives to detention;
(4) Approved center means a center that has applied for and received
approval from the Director of the Office of Dispute Resolution under
section 25-2909;
(5) Civil citation means a noncriminal notice which cannot result in
a criminal record and is described in section 43-248.02;
(6) Cost or costs means (a) the sum or equivalent expended, paid, or
charged for goods or services, or expenses incurred, or (b) the
contracted or negotiated price;
(7) Criminal street gang means a group of three or more people with
a common identifying name, sign, or symbol whose group identity or
purposes include engaging in illegal activities;
(8) Criminal street gang member means a person who willingly or
voluntarily becomes and remains a member of a criminal street gang;
(9) Custodian means a nonparental caretaker having physical custody
of the juvenile and includes an appointee described in section 43-294;
(10) Detention means the temporary care of a juvenile in a
physically restrictive facility designed with constructions or fixtures
to control the movement of the juvenile to secure the juvenile's lawful
custody;
(11) (10) Guardian means a person, other than a parent, who has
qualified by law as the guardian of a juvenile pursuant to testamentary
or court appointment, but excludes a person who is merely a guardian ad
-5-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
litem;
(12) (11) Juvenile means any person under the age of eighteen;
(13) (12) Juvenile court means the separate juvenile court where it
has been established pursuant to sections 43-2,111 to 43-2,127 and the
county court sitting as a juvenile court in all other counties. Nothing
in the Nebraska Juvenile Code shall be construed to deprive the district
courts of their habeas corpus, common-law, or chancery jurisdiction or
the county courts and district courts of jurisdiction of domestic
relations matters as defined in section 25-2740;
(14) (13) Juvenile detention facility has the same meaning as in
section 83-4,125;
(15) (14) Legal custody has the same meaning as in section 43-2922;
(16) (15) Mental health facility means a treatment facility as
defined in section 71-914 or a government, private, or state hospital
which treats mental illness;
(17) (16) Nonoffender means a juvenile who is subject to the
jurisdiction of the juvenile court for reasons other than legally
prohibited conduct, including, but not limited to, juveniles described in
subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247;
(18) (17) Parent means one or both parents or stepparents when the
stepparent is married to a parent who has physical custody of the
juvenile as of the filing of the petition;
(19) (18) Parties means the juvenile as described in section 43-247
and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian;
(20) (19) Physical custody has the same meaning as in section
43-2922;
(21) (20) Except in proceedings under the Nebraska Indian Child
Welfare Act, relative means father, mother, grandfather, grandmother,
brother, sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle,
aunt, first cousin, nephew, or niece;
(22) (21) Restorative justice means practices, programs, or services
-6-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
that emphasize repairing the harm caused to victims and the community by
persons who have caused the harm or committed an offense. Restorative
justice practices may include, but are not limited to, victim youth
conferencing, victim-offender mediation, youth or community dialogue,
panels, circles, and truancy mediation;
(23) (22) Restorative justice facilitator means a qualified
individual who has been trained to facilitate restorative justice
practices. A qualified individual shall be approved by the referring
county attorney, city attorney, or juvenile or county court judge.
Factors for approval may include, but are not limited to, an individual's
education and training in restorative justice principles and practices;
experience in facilitating restorative justice sessions; understanding of
the necessity to do no harm to either the victim or the person who harmed
the victim; and proven commitment to ethical practices;
(24) (23) Seal a record means that a record shall not be available
to the public except upon the order of a court upon good cause shown;
(25) (24) Secure detention means detention in a highly structured,
residential, hardware-secured facility designed to restrict a juvenile's
movement;
(26) (25) Staff secure juvenile facility means a juvenile
residential facility operated by a political subdivision (a) which does
not include construction designed to physically restrict the movements
and activities of juveniles who are in custody in the facility, (b) in
which physical restriction of movement or activity of juveniles is
provided solely through staff, (c) which may establish reasonable rules
restricting ingress to and egress from the facility, and (d) in which the
movements and activities of individual juvenile residents may, for
treatment purposes, be restricted or subject to control through the use
of intensive staff supervision. Staff secure juvenile facility does not
include any institution operated by the Department of Correctional
Services;
-7-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
(27) (26) Status offender means a juvenile who has been charged with
or adjudicated for conduct which would not be a crime if committed by an
adult, including, but not limited to, juveniles charged under subdivision
(3)(b) of section 43-247 and sections 53-180.01 and 53-180.02;
(28) (27) Traffic offense means any nonfelonious act in violation of
a law or ordinance regulating vehicular or pedestrian travel, whether
designated a misdemeanor or a traffic infraction; and
(29) (28) Young adult means an individual older than eighteen years
of age but under twenty-one years of age.
Sec. 3. Section 43-246.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-246.01 (1) The juvenile court shall have exclusive original
jurisdiction as to:
(a) Any juvenile described in subdivision (3) or (11) of section
43-247;
(b) Any juvenile who was under sixteen years of age at the time the
alleged offense was committed and the offense falls under subdivision (1)
of section 43-247;
(c) A party or proceeding described in subdivision (5) or (7) of
section 43-247; and
(d) Any juvenile who was under twelve fourteen years of age at the
time the alleged offense was committed and the offense falls under
subdivision (2) of section 43-247.
(2)(a) The juvenile court shall also have exclusive original
jurisdiction as to:
(i) Any juvenile who is alleged to have committed an offense under
subdivision (1) of section 43-247 and who was sixteen years of age or
seventeen years of age at the time the alleged offense was committed; and
(ii) Any juvenile who was twelve fourteen years of age or older at
the time the alleged offense was committed and the offense falls under
subdivision (2) of section 43-247 except offenses enumerated in
-8-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of section 29-1816.
(b) Proceedings initiated under subsection (2) of this section may
be transferred as provided in section 43-274.
(3)(a) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original
jurisdiction with the county court or district court as to:
(i) Any juvenile described in subdivision (4) of section 43-247;
(ii) Any proceeding under subdivision (6), (8), (9), or (10) of
section 43-247; and
(iii) Any juvenile described in subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of section
29-1816.
(b) Proceedings initiated under subsection (3) of this section may
be transferred as provided in section 43-274.
Sec. 4. Section 43-250, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-250 (1) A peace officer who takes a juvenile into temporary
custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1), (2), (3), or (7) of
section 43-248 shall immediately take reasonable measures to notify the
juvenile's parent, guardian, custodian, or relative and shall proceed as
follows:
(a) The peace officer may release a juvenile taken into temporary
custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1), (2), or (7) of section
43-248;
(b) The peace officer may require a juvenile taken into temporary
custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1) or (2) of section 43-248
to appear before the court of the county in which such juvenile was taken
into custody at a time and place specified in the written notice prepared
in triplicate by the peace officer or at the call of the court. The
notice shall also contain a concise statement of the reasons such
juvenile was taken into custody. The peace officer shall deliver one copy
of the notice to such juvenile and require such juvenile or his or her
parent, guardian, other custodian, or relative, or both, to sign a
-9-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
written promise that such signer will appear at the time and place
designated in the notice. Upon the execution of the promise to appear,
the peace officer shall immediately release such juvenile. The peace
officer shall, as soon as practicable, file one copy of the notice with
the county attorney or city attorney and, when required by the court,
also file a copy of the notice with the court or the officer appointed by
the court for such purpose; or
(c) The peace officer may retain temporary custody of a juvenile
taken into temporary custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1),
(2), or (3) of section 43-248 and deliver the juvenile, if necessary, to
the probation officer and communicate all relevant available information
regarding such juvenile to the probation officer. The probation officer
shall determine the need for detention of the juvenile as provided in
section 43-260.01. Upon determining that the juvenile should be placed in
detention or an alternative to detention and securing placement in such
setting by the probation officer, the peace officer shall implement the
probation officer's decision to release or to detain and place the
juvenile. When secure detention of a juvenile is necessary, such
detention shall occur within a juvenile detention facility except:
(i) When a juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of section
43-247, except for a status offender, is taken into temporary custody
within a metropolitan statistical area and where no juvenile detention
facility is reasonably available, the juvenile may be delivered, for
temporary custody not to exceed six hours, to a secure area of a jail or
other facility intended or used for the detention of adults solely for
the purposes of identifying the juvenile and ascertaining his or her
health and well-being and for safekeeping while awaiting transport to an
appropriate juvenile placement or release to a responsible party;
(ii) When a juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of section
43-247, except for a status offender, is taken into temporary custody
outside of a metropolitan statistical area and where no juvenile
-10-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
detention facility is reasonably available, the juvenile may be
delivered, for temporary custody not to exceed twenty-four hours
excluding nonjudicial days and while awaiting an initial court
appearance, to a secure area of a jail or other facility intended or used
for the detention of adults solely for the purposes of identifying the
juvenile and ascertaining his or her health and well-being and for
safekeeping while awaiting transport to an appropriate juvenile placement
or release to a responsible party;
(iii) Whenever a juvenile is held in a secure area of any jail or
other facility intended or used for the detention of adults, there shall
be no verbal, visual, or physical contact between the juvenile and any
incarcerated adult and there shall be adequate staff to supervise and
monitor the juvenile's activities at all times. This subdivision shall
not apply to a juvenile charged with a felony as an adult in county or
district court if he or she is sixteen years of age or older;
(iv) If a juvenile is under sixteen years of age or is a juvenile as
described in subdivision (3) of section 43-247, he or she shall not be
placed within a secure area of a jail or other facility intended or used
for the detention of adults;
(v) If, within the time limits specified in subdivision (1)(c)(i) or
(1)(c)(ii) of this section, a felony charge is filed against the juvenile
as an adult in county or district court, he or she may be securely held
in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults
beyond the specified time limits;
(vi) A status offender or nonoffender taken into temporary custody
shall not be held in a secure area of a jail or other facility intended
or used for the detention of adults; and
(vii) A juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of section
43-247, except for a status offender, may be held in a secure area of a
jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults for
up to six hours before and six hours after any court appearance.
-11-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
(2)(a) (2) A juvenile taken into custody pursuant to a legal warrant
of arrest shall be delivered to a probation officer.
(b) For a felony arrest of a juvenile, the probation officer shall
make a recommendation for detention, release without restrictions, or
release to an alternative to detention as provided in section 43-260.01.
The probation officer shall forward all intake information to a judge,
who shall consult with the probation officer, and then determine the need
for detention. In making such determination, the judge shall consider the
factors in subdivision (2) of section 43-260.01 but shall not be bound by
such factors.
(c) For an arrest of a juvenile not involving a felony, the
probation officer who shall determine the need for detention of the
juvenile as provided in section 43-260.01.
(d) If detention is not required, the juvenile may be released
without bond if:
(i) Such such release is in the best interests of the juvenile; ,
(ii) The physical the safety of persons in the community will not be
seriously threatened;
(iii) Detention is not necessary to secure the presence of the
juvenile at the next hearing, as evidenced by a demonstrable record of
willful failure to appear at a scheduled court hearing within the last
twelve months;
(iv) Detention of such juvenile is not a matter of immediate and
urgent necessity for the protection of such juvenile as evidenced by a
demonstrable record of fleeing from law enforcement, absconding from a
court-ordered placement, absconding from home, committing a violent
offense, committing multiple property crimes, or threatening to cause
harm to self or others; and
(v) The is not at risk, and the court that issued the warrant is
notified that the juvenile had been taken into custody and was released.
(3) In determining the appropriate temporary placement or
-12-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
alternative to detention of a juvenile under this section, the peace
officer shall select the placement or alternative which is least
restrictive of the juvenile's freedom so long as such placement or
alternative is compatible with the best interests of the juvenile and the
safety of the community. Any alternative to detention shall cause the
least restriction of the juvenile's freedom of movement consistent with
the best interests of the juvenile and the safety of the community.
(4) When a juvenile is taken into temporary custody pursuant to
subdivision (4) of section 43-248, the peace officer shall deliver the
juvenile to the enrolled school of such juvenile.
(5) When a juvenile is taken into temporary custody pursuant to
subdivision (5), (6), or (7) of section 43-248, and not released under
subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the peace officer shall deliver the
custody of such juvenile to the Department of Health and Human Services
which shall make a temporary placement of the juvenile in the least
restrictive environment consistent with the best interests of the
juvenile as determined by the department. The department shall supervise
such placement and, if necessary, consent to any necessary emergency
medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment for such juvenile. The
department shall have no other authority with regard to such temporary
custody until or unless there is an order by the court placing the
juvenile in the custody of the department. If the peace officer delivers
temporary custody of the juvenile pursuant to this subsection, the peace
officer shall make a full written report to the county attorney within
twenty-four hours of taking such juvenile into temporary custody. If a
court order of temporary custody is not issued within forty-eight hours
of taking the juvenile into custody, the temporary custody by the
department shall terminate and the juvenile shall be returned to the
custody of his or her parent, guardian, custodian, or relative.
(6) If the peace officer takes the juvenile into temporary custody
pursuant to subdivision (8) of section 43-248, the peace officer may
-13-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
place the juvenile at a mental health facility for evaluation and
emergency treatment or may deliver the juvenile to the Department of
Health and Human Services as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
At the time of the admission or turning the juvenile over to the
department, the peace officer responsible for taking the juvenile into
custody pursuant to subdivision (8) of section 43-248 shall execute a
written certificate as prescribed by the department which will indicate
that the peace officer believes the juvenile to be mentally ill and
dangerous, a summary of the subject's behavior supporting such
allegations, and that the harm described in section 71-908 is likely to
occur before proceedings before a juvenile court may be invoked to obtain
custody of the juvenile. A copy of the certificate shall be forwarded to
the county attorney. The peace officer shall notify the juvenile's
parents, guardian, custodian, or relative of the juvenile's placement.
Sec. 5. Section 43-251.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-251.01 All placements and commitments of juveniles for
evaluations or as temporary or final dispositions are subject to the
following:
(1) No juvenile shall be confined in an adult correctional facility
as a disposition of the court;
(2) A juvenile who is found to be a juvenile as described in
subdivision (3) of section 43-247 shall not be placed in an adult
correctional facility, the secure youth confinement facility operated by
the Department of Correctional Services, or a youth rehabilitation and
treatment center or committed to the Office of Juvenile Services;
(3) A juvenile who is found to be a juvenile as described in
subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of section 43-247 shall not be assigned or
transferred to an adult correctional facility or the secure youth
confinement facility operated by the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) A juvenile under the age of fourteen years shall not be placed
-14-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
with or committed to a youth rehabilitation and treatment center;
(5)(a) A juvenile shall not be detained unless:
(i) The the physical safety of persons in the community would be
seriously threatened;
(ii) Detention or detention is necessary to secure the presence of
the juvenile at the next hearing, as evidenced by a demonstrable record
of willful failure to appear at a scheduled court hearing within the last
twelve months; or
(iii) Detention is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for
the protection of such juvenile as evidenced by a demonstrable record of
fleeing from law enforcement, absconding from a court-ordered placement,
absconding from home, committing a violent offense, committing multiple
property crimes, or threatening to cause harm to self or others;
(b) A child ten twelve years of age or younger shall not be placed
in detention under any circumstances; and
(c) A juvenile shall not be placed into detention:
(i) To allow a parent or guardian to avoid his or her legal
responsibility;
(ii) To punish, treat, or rehabilitate such juvenile;
(iii) To permit more convenient administrative access to such
juvenile;
(iv) To facilitate further interrogation or investigation; or
(v) Due to a lack of more appropriate facilities except in case of
an emergency as provided in section 43-430;
(6) A juvenile alleged to be a juvenile as described in subdivision
(3) of section 43-247 shall not be placed in a juvenile detention
facility, including a wing labeled as staff secure at such facility,
unless the designated staff secure portion of the facility fully complies
with subdivision (5) of section 83-4,125 and the ingress and egress to
the facility are restricted solely through staff supervision; and
(7) A juvenile alleged to be a juvenile as described in subdivision
-15-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
(1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 shall not be placed out of his
or her home as a dispositional order of the court unless:
(a) All available community-based resources have been exhausted to
assist the juvenile and his or her family; and
(b) Maintaining the juvenile in the home presents a significant risk
of harm to the juvenile or community.
Sec. 6. Section 43-253, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-253 (1) Upon delivery to the probation officer of a juvenile who
has been taken into temporary custody under section 29-401, 43-248, or
43-250, the probation officer shall immediately investigate the situation
of the juvenile and the nature and circumstances of the events
surrounding his or her being taken into custody. Such investigation may
be by informal means when appropriate.
(2) The probation officer's decision to release the juvenile from
custody or place the juvenile in detention or an alternative to detention
shall be based upon the results of the standardized juvenile detention
screening instrument described in section 43-260.01.
(3) No juvenile who has been taken into temporary custody under
subdivision (1)(c) of section 43-250 or subsection (6) of section
43-286.01 or pursuant to an alleged violation of an order for conditional
release shall be detained in any detention facility or be subject to an
alternative to detention infringing upon the juvenile's liberty interest
for longer than twenty-four hours, excluding nonjudicial days, after
having been taken into custody unless such juvenile has appeared
personally before a court of competent jurisdiction for a hearing to
determine if continued detention, services, or supervision is necessary.
The juvenile shall be represented by counsel at the hearing. Whether such
counsel shall be provided at the cost of the county shall be determined
as provided in subsection (1) of section 43-272. If continued secure
detention is ordered, such detention shall be in a juvenile detention
-16-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
facility, except that a juvenile charged with a felony as an adult in
county or district court may be held in an adult jail as set forth in
subdivision (1)(c)(v) of section 43-250. A juvenile placed in an
alternative to detention, but not in detention, may only waive this
hearing with the agreement of the juvenile's through counsel and the
county attorney or city attorney.
(4) When the probation officer deems it to be in the best interests
of the juvenile, the probation officer shall immediately release such
juvenile to the custody of his or her parent. If the juvenile has both a
custodial and a noncustodial parent and the probation officer deems that
release of the juvenile to the custodial parent is not in the best
interests of the juvenile, the probation officer shall, if it is deemed
to be in the best interests of the juvenile, attempt to contact the
noncustodial parent, if any, of the juvenile and to release the juvenile
to such noncustodial parent. If such release is not possible or not
deemed to be in the best interests of the juvenile, the probation officer
may release the juvenile to the custody of a legal guardian, a
responsible relative, or another responsible person.
(5) The court may admit such juvenile to bail by bond in such amount
and on such conditions and security as the court, in its sole discretion,
shall determine, or the court may proceed as provided in section 43-254.
In no case shall the court or probation officer release such juvenile if
it appears that:
(a) The physical safety of persons in the community would be
seriously threatened; or
(b) Detention is necessary to secure the presence of the juvenile at
the next hearing, as evidenced by a demonstrable record of willful
failure to appear at a scheduled court hearing within the last twelve
months; or .
(c) Detention is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the
protection of such juvenile as evidenced by a demonstrable record of
-17-

LB556 LB556
2025 2025
fleeing from law enforcement, absconding from a court-ordered placement,
absconding from home, committing a violent offense, committing multiple
property crimes, or threatening to cause harm to self or others.
Sec. 7. Section 43-260.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-260.01 The need for preadjudication placement, services, or
supervision and the need for detention of a juvenile and whether
detention or an alternative to detention is indicated shall be:
(1) Subject subject to subdivision (5) of section 43-251.01; and
(2) Determined shall be determined as follows:
(a) (1) The standardized juvenile detention screening instrument
shall be used to evaluate the juvenile;
(b) (2) If the results indicate that detention is not required, the
juvenile shall be released without restriction or released to an
alternative to detention; and
(c) (3) If the results indicate that detention is required,
detention shall be pursued.
Sec. 8. Original sections 29-1816, 43-245, 43-246.01, 43-250,
43-251.01, 43-253, and 43-260.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-18-